Hawaii statutes.
§457-13 Exceptions. This chapter does
not prohibit:

(1) The furnishing of nursing assistance in an
emergency;

(2) The practice of nursing which is incidental to
their program of study by students enrolled in nursing education programs
accredited by the board;

(3) The practice of nursing under a nonrenewable
permit by:

(A) A graduate of; or

(B) An applicant who has provided proof that
the applicant has completed the entire educational curriculum required for
graduation for a nursing license from

a school which is in or under the
jurisdiction of the United States, and whose accreditation is recognized by the
board; provided that following completion of (A) or (B), the candidate takes
the first licensing examination scheduled by any board of nursing recognized by
the board and has submitted to the board an application for a license to
practice nursing in this State; and provided further that the permit shall be
valid for three months or until the results of the licensing examination are
received by the board;

(4) The practice of any legally qualified nurse of
another state who is employed by the United States or any bureau, division, or
agency thereof, while in the discharge of the nurse's official duties;

(5) The practice of nursing in connection with
healing by prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the tenets and
practice of any well recognized church or religious denomination, provided that
no person practicing such nursing claims to practice as a registered nurse or a
licensed practical nurse; or

(6) The administration of oral and topical medication
and in emergency situations, other premeasured medication, by school health
aides as provided in section 321-242. [L 1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1981, c
200, §2; am L 1983, c 119, §10; am L 1990, c 105, §4; am L 1991, c 139, §1; am
L 1997, c 217, §6]

Note

Section 321-242 referred to in text is repealed.

Cross References

Self-administration of medication by student and emergency
administration permitted, see §302A-1164.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next